src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
häältelugemiskomisjon+N:häälte%#lugemis%#komisjon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@häärber+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘äärber REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõbe+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõbe HALE  "weight: 8 " ; 
hõbedaühend+N:hõbeda%#ühend REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbeheik+N:hõbe%#h˘eik TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbekross+N:hõbe%#kr˘osʲs TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbelind+N:hõbe%#l˘inD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbelusikas+N:hõbe%#lusika LOHAKAS  "weight: 10 " ; 
hõbeläik+N:hõbe%#l˘äik TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbemedal+N:hõbe%#medal REDEL  "weight: 9 " ; 
hõbemünt+N:hõbe%#m˘ünʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbepaber+N:hõbe%#paber REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbepaju+N:hõbe%#paju KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõberaha+N:hõbe%#raha KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõberubla+N:hõbe%#rubla RUBLA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõberublatükk+N:hõbe%#rubla%#t˘ükk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbeseekel+N:hõbe%#s˘eekel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõbetis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõbetis OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbetukat+N:hõbe%#tukat REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbetükk+N:hõbe%#t˘ükk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõbeuur+N:hõbe%#˘uur TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõigatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõigatus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõik+N:h˘õik%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõikaja+N:h˘õikaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõim+N:h˘õim%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 8 " ; 
hõimkond+N:h˘õimk˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõimlane+N:h˘õimlane SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõimlus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õimlus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõimuliit+N:hõimu%#l˘iit%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõimuline+N:hõimuline OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõimurahvas+N:hõimu%#r˘ahva KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõimutava+N:hõimu%#tava KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõisk+N:h˘õisK1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõiskamine+N:h˘õiskamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõivamine+N:h˘õivamine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõivang+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõivang VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõivar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õivar REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõivatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõivatus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
hõive+N:h˘õive PINGE  "weight: 9 " ; 
hõlbustamine+N:hõlbustamine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlbustus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõlbustus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõlje+N:h˘õlʲje PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõljuk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõlʲjuk REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõljum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õlʲjum REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõljumine+N:h˘õlʲjumine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõllandus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõllandus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlm+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õlm%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlmavus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õlmavus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlmik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõlʲmik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõlmikpuu+N:hõlʲmik%#p˘uu%>%{id%} PUU  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõlmuks+N:h˘õlm%#˘uK1s LAPS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlp+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õlp%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlpsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õlpsus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõlst+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õlʲst TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
hõlvamine+N:h˘õlvamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõng+N:h˘õng%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõngus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õngus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõngushäälik+N:h˘õngus%#häälik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõredus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõredus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõrendamine+N:hõrendamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõrendatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõrendatus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõrendik+N:hˈõrend˘ik ELANIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõrendus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõrendus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõrgutis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõrgutis OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõrgutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõrgutus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõrkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õrkus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõrnas+N:h˘õrna KOTKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõõg+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õõg%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõgamine+N:h˘õõgamine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõgumine+N:h˘õõgumine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõõgus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õõgus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõõgutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõõgutus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Single@hõõr+N:@P.Stem.Single@h˘õõr%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõrdpidur+N:h˘õõrd%#pidur REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõrdpind+N:h˘õõrd%#p˘inD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõrdumine+N:h˘õõrdumine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõõrdumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õõrdumus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõõrduvus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘õõrduvus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõre+N:h˘õõrD1e PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõrel+N:h˘õõrE2l MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõrits+N:hõõrits MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõrmed+N:h˘õõrE2 HAARE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõrumine+N:h˘õõrumine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
hõõruti+N:hõõruti AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hõõtsik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hõõtsik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hööritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hööritus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@höövel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘öövel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hööveldus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hööveldus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüaliin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüal˘iin TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüatsint+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüats˘inʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hübriid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hübr˘iid TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
hüdra+N:hüdra RUBLA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüdraat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüdr˘aat TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüdrant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüdr˘anʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüdraulika+N:hüdrˈaulika AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüdreemia+N:hüdr˘eemia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüdriid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüdr˘iid TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüdroelektrijaam+N:hüdro%#el˘ektri%#j˘aam%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 10 " ; 
hüdrofosfaat+N:hüdro%#fosf˘aat TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüdrograaf+N:hüdro%#gr˘aaf TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüdrograafia+N:hüdro%#gr˘aafia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüdrokarbonaat+N:hüdro%#kˈarbon˘aat TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüdroksiid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hˈüdroks˘iid TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüdroloog+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hˈüdrol˘oog TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüdroloogia+N:hüdrol˘oogia AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüdrolüüs+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hˈüdrol˘üüs TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüdroplaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hˈüdropl˘aan TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüdrosool+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hˈüdros˘ool TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüdrotsefaalia+N:hüdro%#tsef˘aalia AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hügieen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hügi˘een TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hügieenilisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hügiˈeenilisus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hügieeninõue+N:hügiˈeeni%#n˘õuD1e PINGE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hügroskoop+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hügro%#sk˘oop TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüksoslane+N:h˘üksoslane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüljatu+N:hülʲjatu AASTA  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüljatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hülʲjatus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüljes+N:h˘ülʲJ1G1e KOTKAS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hülss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘ülʲss TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hümn+N:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘ümn TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüpak+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüpak VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüpatus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüpatus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüpekas+N:hüpeka LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüperboloid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüperbol˘oid TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüperbool+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hˈüperb˘ool TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüperborealane+N:hüperbor˘ealane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüperesteesia+N:hüperest˘eesia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüperon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüperon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüpertensioon+N:hüper%#tensi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
hüpertoonia+N:hüper%#t˘oonia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüpertooniahaige+N:hüper%#t˘oonia%#h˘aige AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüpertooniatõbi+N:hüper%#t˘oonia%#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüpertoonik+N:hüper%#toonik VIRSIK  "weight: 10 " ; 
hüpertrihhoos+N:hüper%#trihh˘oos TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
hüpertroofia+N:hüper%#tr˘oofia AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüperviisor+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüperv˘iisor REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüpik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@hüpik VIRSIK  "weight: 11 " ; 
